Washington statutes.
RCW 43.166.010

Authorization—Formation.

(1) State lands development authorities are hereby authorized to oversee and manage the development or redevelopment of state-owned property that is within or adjacent to manufacturing industrial centers. Any property owned or managed by the department of natural resources is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The legislative delegation from a district containing state-owned land that is included within, or is adjacent to, a manufacturing industrial center may propose the formation of a state lands development authority. The proposal must be presented in writing to the relevant legislative committees in both the house of representatives and the senate. The proposal must contain:

(a) The proposed general geographic boundaries of the state lands development authority; and

(b) Legislative findings relating to formation of the state lands development authority which find that:

(i) The state owns property within the boundaries of the proposed state lands development authority;

(ii) The state-owned land is located within or adjacent to a manufacturing industrial center;

(iii) The state agency with custodial responsibility for the property has completed an assessment regarding the current use, future use, and a projected date or conditions when the land is vacant, excess, or surplus to the mission of the state agency;

(iv) The legislature intends that the state lands development authority be appropriately funded and staffed; and

(v) The formation of a state lands development authority to oversee and manage the development or redevelopment of the state-owned land will be useful and beneficial to the community within and adjacent to the boundaries of the state lands development authority.

(3) Formation of a state lands development authority is subject to legislative authorization by statute.

(4) A state lands development authority may only be formed in a county with a population of 2,000,000 or greater.

(5) For the purposes of this chapter, all state lands development authorities are a public body corporate and politic and instrumentality of the state of Washington.

[ 2022 c 259 s 1.]